Maryland, session 2025, HB1195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
17–102.
(a) The Commission consists of:
(1) three commissioners from Prince George’s County, appointed by the
County Executive subject to the confirmation of the County Council; and
(2) three commissioners from Montgomery County, OF WHOM:
(I) TWO ARE appointed by the County Executive subject to the
confirmation of the County Council; AND
(II) ONE IS THE DIRECTOR OF THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE.
(b) (1) Each commissioner from Prince George’s County shall be a resident of
the sanitary district.
(2) (i) Each commissioner from Montgomery County shall be a
registered voter of Montgomery County.
(ii) Each commissioner from Prince George’s County shall be a
registered voter of Prince George’s County.
(c) (1) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (A)(2)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, AN individual may not be appointed or continue in office as a commissioner if
the individual holds any other position of profit or trust under the Constitution or laws of
the State or any political subdivision of the State.
(2) Not more than two commissioners from Montgomery County may be of
the same political party.
(d) (1) The term of a commissioner is 4 years and begins on June 1 of the year
of appointment.
(2) The terms of commissioners are staggered as required by the terms
provided for commissioners on July 1, 1982.
(3) At the end of a term, a commissioner continues to serve until a successor
is appointed and takes the oath of office.

HOUSE BILL 1195 3
(4) A commissioner who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for
the rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and takes the oath of office.
(5) A vacancy on the Commission does not impair the right of the
remaining commissioners to exercise all the powers of the Commission.
17–107.
(a) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
THE members of the Commission are entitled to the following annual salaries:
(i) chair .................................................................................. $13,500;
(ii) vice chair ................................................................... $13,000; and
(iii) commissioners .................................................................. $13,000.
(2) The salary shall be paid every 2 weeks.
(b) While in office, commissioners may participate in any Commission program of
group health, life, and disability insurance to the same extent and under the same terms
as Commission staff.
(c) The Commission may employ a staff in accordance with the Commission’s
budget.
(D) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION WHO ALSO SERVES AS THE DIRECTOR
OF THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION FOR DUTIES PERFORMED AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION.
17–202.1.
(A) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EVERY 5 FISCAL YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP LONG–RANGE PLANNING SCENARIOS FOR ITS
OPERATING AND CAPITAL BUDGETS AND DEBT SERVICE.
(B) THE SCENARIOS SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) PROJECTIONS THAT DO NOT INCLUDE THE AD VALOREM TAX
AUTHORIZED UNDER § 22–112 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) PROJECTIONS THAT INCLUDE A RANGE OF AD VALOREM TAXES;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1195
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, STRESS
TESTING THE IMPACT OF A WIDE RANGE OF ECONOMIC CONDITIONS THAT MAY
AFFECT THE COMMISSION AND ITS FINANCIAL SOLVENCY, INCLUDING CHANGES IN
EMPLOYMENT RATES, INTEREST RATES, AND WATER USAGE.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY CONSULT WITH INDEPENDENT EXPERTS
IN DEVELOPING LONG–RANGE PLANNING SCENARIOS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) STRESS TESTING DONE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE BASED ON INDUSTRY STANDARDS.
17–401.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Payee” means a person that receives from the Commission an
aggregate payment of $25,000 in a single fiscal year.
(ii) “Payee” does not include:
1. a Commission employee with respect to the employee’s
compensation; or
2. a Commission retiree with respect to the retiree’s
retirement allowance.
(3) “Searchable website” means a website created in accordance with this
section that displays and searches payment data of the Commission.
(b) The Commission shall:
(1) publish annually in at least one newspaper in Montgomery County and
one newspaper in Prince George’s County a copy of the current financial statement of the
Commission;
(2) employ a certified public accountant licensed to practice in the State to
audit the books and accounts of the Commission;
(3) keep available for public inspection during business hours at its
principal office the annual audit and current financial statement; and
(4) file annually with the county executives and county councils of
Montgomery County and Prince George’s County, and the Montgomery County and Prince
George’s County Senate and House delegations to the Maryland General Assembly a
certified copy of the annual audit and current financial statement.

HOUSE BILL 1195 5
(c) On or before July 1, 2020, the Commission shall develop and operate a single
searchable website accessible to the public at no cost through the Internet.
(d) The searchable website shall contain Commission payment data including:
(1) the name of each payee receiving a payment;
(2) the location of the payee by postal zip code; and
(3) the amount of the payment.
(e) The searchable website shall allow the user to:
(1) search data for fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter; and
(2) search by the following data fields:
(i) a payee receiving a payment; and
(ii) the zip code of a payee receiving a payment.
(F) THE SEARCHABLE WEBSITE SHALL CONTAIN ALL BOND RATING
REPORTS ISSUED FOR THE COMMISSION FROM ONE OF THE MAJOR CREDIT RATING
AGENCIES, INCLUDING:
(1) A COPY OF ANY AUDITS COMPLETED IN RELATION TO A BOND
RATING REPORT; AND
(2) A COPY OF ANY FINANCIAL STATEMENTS PROVIDED IN RELATION
TO A BOND RATING REPORT.
(G) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SEARCHABLE WEBSITE SHALL CONTAIN DATA RELATED TO THE REFUND HEARING
BOARD OF THE COMMISSION AND THE DISPUTE RESOLUTION BOARD OF THE
COMMISSION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF CASES FILED;
(II) THE NUMBER OF CASES CLOSED;
(III) THE NUMBER OF CASES GRANTED;
(IV) THE NUMBER OF CASES DENIED;

HOUSE BILL 1195
(V) THE REFUND AMOUNT REQUESTED IN EACH CASE; AND
(VI) THE REFUND AMOUNT GRANTED IN EACH CASE.
(2) THE DATA PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT CONTAIN ANY PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION.
(H) THE SEARCHABLE WEBSITE SHALL INCLUDE A COPY OF ANY STRESS
TESTING COMPLETED FOR ANY LONG–RANGE PLANNING SCENARIOS DEVELOPED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 17–202.1 OF THIS TITLE.
[(f)] (I) This section may not be construed to require the disclosure of
information that is required to be kept confidential under federal, State, or local law.
[(g)] (J) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the county council or
county executive of Montgomery County or Prince George’s County may, in person or by a
duly authorized agent, audit and examine the books and records of the Commission.
(2) The Commission may not be required to pay the cost of the audit or
examination under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
25–504.
(a) The Commission:
(1) may provide for the billing and collection of the water and sewer usage
charges on an estimated basis for periods of 6 months or less, based on the historical daily
average consumption calculated from actual previous usage;
(2) shall read the meter at least once every 6 months; and
(3) (i) shall base the final bill for the 6–month period on the actual
consumption adjusted by previous estimates, if the meter had not been read because it was
inaccessible;
(ii) shall base the final bill for the 6–month period on the historical
daily average consumption, calculated from actual previous usage, if a final reading cannot
be made because:
1. the meter malfunctioned;
2. the meter had been taken out of service for repairs,
maintenance, or water system relining purposes; or
3. there was theft of service;

HOUSE BILL 1195 7
(iii) may modify the historical daily average consumption calculation
based on appropriate evidence submitted by the owner; [and]
(iv) MAY NOT LIMIT HOW FREQUENTLY A CUSTOMER MAY
RECEIVE AN ADJUSTMENT UNDER § 3.20.040(A) OR (B) OF THE WASHINGTON
SUBURBAN SANITARY COMMISSION CODE OF REGULATIONS; AND
(V) may not base a final bill on estimated usage for two consecutive
6–month periods.
(b) (1) (I) The Commission shall bill for the amount of water and sewer
usage charges to each property served monthly, every other month, OR four times a year,
[or twice a year,] as the Commission determines.
(II) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE
COMMISSION SHALL BILL ON A MONTHLY BASIS.
(2) On receipt each bill is payable to the Commission.
28–102.
THE COMMISSION SHALL APPOINT A REPRESENTATIVE TO SERVE ON THE
COORDINATING COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER PART IV OF THE 1984 AVENEL
FARM DEVELOPMENT PLAN MASTER AGREEMENT SIGNED BY THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission shall study the feasibility of
using differential rates among different customer classes for the Commission’s service rates
and charges, including studying the revenue possibilities of and economic impact on the
different customer classes.
(b) On or before October 1, 2026, the Commission shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any recommended statutory changes, to the members of the
Montgomery County and Prince George’s County delegations to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Office of Program Evaluation and Government Accountability in the
Department of Legislative Services shall conduct a review of the efficiency and
sustainability of the operations of the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
(b) The review conducted under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) a review of the statutory provisions related to the Commission,

HOUSE BILL 1195
including the Commission’s regulations, policies, and procedures;
(2) a review of the Commission’s budgetary process, including the annual
setting of rates through the relevant county councils;
(3) a review of the Commission’s process for entering into consent decrees;
(4) a review of the subject matter expertise of appointed commissioners;
(5) benchmarking with other systems across a range of operating cost
metrics related to the efficiency and sustainability of the Commission;
(6) a review of the effectiveness of the Commission’s capital program and
its ability to maintain water and sewer distribution pipelines and processing plants that
meet asset management standards;
(7) a study on the Commission’s use of its police force, including:
(i) a comparison of the size and scope of the Commission’s police
force with the police force of other utilities; and
(ii) whether there are more efficient approaches to water utility
security and policing;
(8) an analysis on the impact of the Commission not being a government
entity in the context of access to government programs that provide customer water
assistance or other available funding;
(9) a review of the role the Public Service Commission plays in oversight of
the Commission, including in its review of the reasonableness of any rate, charge, or
assessment done in accordance with § 25–105 of the Public Utilities Article; and
(10) an analysis of whether the Office of the Inspector General of the
Commission is effective in achieving the purposes of the Office, including:
(i) whether the Office is sufficiently independent of the Commission
and management within the Commission; and
(ii) whether the mandate of the Office should include additional
reviews and reports that would help achieve the purposes of the Office, including reports
on the effectiveness of internal controls over finance, operations, and compliance activities.
(c) On or before October 1, 2027, the Office of Program Evaluation and
Government Accountability shall report its findings and recommendations to the members
of the Montgomery County and Prince George’s County delegations to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.

HOUSE BILL 1195 9
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1
month and, at the end of October 31, 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Section 3 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the
end of October 31, 2027, Section 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.